District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.14

District of Columbia repayment option.

The District of Columbia retains the right to direct the Authority to purchase its own bonds and notes subject to the terms and conditions of § 10-1202.11(h), for the purpose of dissolving or altering the Authority after such bonds and notes are cancelled or defeased.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 214, 41 DCR 5333

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-815.